incubator/apertium-lt-en.lt.dix
    <pardef n="straip/snis__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nsio</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nsiui</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>snį</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>snyje</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sni</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nsiu</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>snis</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nsių</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nsiams</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nsius</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nsiuose</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nsiai</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nsiais</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nsiai</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="abėc/lė__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lės</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lei</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lę</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lėje</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ėle</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lė</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lių</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lėms</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ėles</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lėse</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lės</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lėmis</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lės</l>
          <r>lė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="var/is__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>io</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iui</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>į</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yje</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ių</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iams</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ius</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iuose</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iais</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pavy/zdys__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>džio</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>džiui</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdį</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdyje</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdy</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>džiu</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdys</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>džių</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>džiams</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>džius</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>džiuose</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>džiai</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>džiais</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>džiai</l>
          <r>zdys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="modelis"><i>model</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="brolis"><i>brol</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="krepšinis"><i>krepšin</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="lygis"><i>lyg</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="įrankis"><i>įrank</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="poreikis"><i>poreik</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="varis"><i>var</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dalyvis"><i>dalyv</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="balsis"><i>bals</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pavyzdys"><i>pavy</i><par n="pavy/zdys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="laikotarpis"><i>laikotarp</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="simbolis"><i>simbol</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="senelis"><i>senel</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vandenilis"><i>vandenil</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="erelis"><i>erel</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="upelis"><i>upel</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="numeris"><i>numer</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="valgis"><i>valg</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mėnulis"><i>mėnul</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ugnis"><i>ugn</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ragasnapis"><i>ragasnap</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="žingsnis"><i>žingsn</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="automobilis"><i>automobil</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="abėclė"><i>abėc</i><par n="abėc/lė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="žemėlapis"><i>žemėlap</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="miestelis"><i>miestel</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="požymis"><i>požym</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pavasaris"><i>pavasar</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="liežuvis"><i>liežuv</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gimtadienis"><i>gimtadien</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="helis"><i>hel</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="spalis"><i>spal</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="grožis"><i>grož</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nulis"><i>nul</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="įvykis"><i>įvyk</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="puslapis"><i>puslap</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="serveris"><i>server</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ugnikalnis"><i>ugnikaln</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kompiuteris"><i>kompiuter</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kūdikis"><i>kūdik</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kiškis"><i>kišk</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kiekis"><i>kiek</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="straipsnis"><i>straip</i><par n="straip/snis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pusiasalis"><i>pusiasal</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="laipsnis"><i>laipsn</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="suomis"><i>suom</i><par n="var/is__n_m"/></e>
